Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-161, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-161. State control over private schools Nothing in this title shall be construed to provide the state board of education or the governing boards of school districts with control or supervision over private schools. END_STATUTE